Washington statutes.
RCW 3.34.120

District judges—Disqualification of partners.

The partner and associates of a judge who is a lawyer shall not practice law before the judge.

[ 1984 c 258 s 18; 1961 c 299 s 21.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.